public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.dic
aerar/A
alŧetar/A
ansar/A
arsar/A
aŧionar/A
axitar/A
xbaɉar/A
inbalbar/A
inbalsemar/A
xbanpolar/A
bardar/A
xbasar/A
xbatocar/A
xbaveŧar/A
dexbendar/A
strabéver/A
biasar/A
inbindelar/A
inbixakar/A
bóɉer/A
xbokonar/A
bonbar/A
bordeđar/A
inbotar/A
brakar/A
dexbramegar/A
dexbraxolar/A
brinkar/A
inbroketar/A
inbrunir/A
bulegar/A
xbuxar/A
scapinar/A
decèñer/A
ascéñer/A
scikarar/A
dexdir/A
indebitar/A
dexdeñar/A
dindolar/A
docar/A
domiŧiliar/A
dormenŧar/A
redreŧar/A
inđalar/A
dexđónxer/A
strađurar/A
riensir/A
eterniđar/A
far/A
desfabregar/A
faliar/A
infangar/A
rinfaŧar/A
klasifegar/A
efeltrir/A
fénxer/A
festonar/A
infiamar/A
desfidar/A
sfilar/A
fínxer/A
fisar/A
influir/A
infogonar/A
fónder/A
informaɉar/A
sforŧar/A
sfrakasar/A
sfrapuñar/A
sfraŧelar/A
frèmer/A
frodar/A
frutuar/A
sfumar/A
fuŧilar/A
ingalar/A
ingalopar/A
garantir/A
xgargariđar/A
dexgateɉar/A
ingloriar/A
xgonbrar/A
gradir/A
ingranir/A
ingranfir/A
kongratular/A
xgremir/A
xgrinfar/A
ingritolir/A
xgrosar/A
inguɉar/A
xguatarar/A
dexgusar/A
ilkamar/A
infilŧar/A
rinproverar/A
reintegrar/A
inŧitar/A
tranxíɉer/A
ɉelomarar/A
reɉetar/A
ɉutar/A
deskaenaŧar/A
reskaldar/A
kalomar/A
deskalŧinar/A
inkanalar/A
kanonar/A
kantar/A
inkañir/A
kaponar/A
karatelar/A
inkarnar/A
deskartar/A
inkasar/A
kastronar/A
deskatramar/A
kautar/A
inkavalkar/A
proklamar/A
kogolar/A
kokolar/A
skolorir/A
komenŧiar/A
sokónber/A
inkonkolar/A
konóser/A
skontentar/A
konvojar/A
inkórer/A
skoraɉir/A
kordonar/A
korsiđar/A
inkotegar/A
skovèrđer/A
skrepolar/A
kriolar/A
krostinar/A
kruŧiar/A
kuatar/A
kuestionar/A
inkukar/A
kuñir/A
kuŧar/A
lanbikar/A
lañar/A
laskar/A
laurear/A
relèđer/A
lestir/A
lexenar/A
paraliđar/A
interlinear/A
lodar/A
xlojar/A
xloŧar/A
stralunar/A
xluxegar/A
inmagarar/A
makinar/A
manaŧar/A
manetar/A
mantekar/A
maravejar/A
marelar/A
inmarŧir/A
inmaskarar/A
dematar/A
xmaŧar/A
inmaxerir/A
xmegolar/A
xmenar/A
xmenuŧar/A
merkantar/A
konprométer/A
traméter/A
militar/A
amirar/A
mixurar/A
mokolar/A
xmoltonar/A
amontar/A
morbar/A
mòrder/A
mormorar/A
moŧar/A
mucarar/A
tramuarar/A
muñegar/A
permutar/A
muxegar/A
malnàser/A
xnaxar/A
xnervar/A
nikiar/A
nolar/A
renovar/A
xñanfiđar/A
oblegar/A
oficar/A
oliar/A
inonbriar/A
dexonorar/A
ordir/A
orlar/A
dexosar/A
oxelar/A
padir/A
pagontar/A
palar/A
inpalidir/A
palpuñar/A
despanocar/A
paoniđar/A
deskonparir/A
parecar/A
partir/A
partorir/A
strapasar/A
inpastiđar/A
patentar/A
inpaŧientar/A
spavejar/A
pekar/A
trapelar/A
inpelumar/A
propénder/A
inpenelar/A
pentir/A
pepolar/A
perlar/A
pestar/A
despetar/A
despetorar/A
peŧolatar/A
piantar/A
pianđotar/A
inpiegar/A
pikolir/A
spiolar/A
spipolar/A
pisolar/A
inpiumar/A
plakar/A
inpocar/A
despoltronar/A
inpomolar/A
kontrapóner/A
desponarar/A
spontar/A
pontiñar/A
repopolar/A
trasportar/A
inpostar/A
potenŧiar/A
pregar/A
sopresar/A
preŧiar/A
procesar/A
spropiar/A
punir/A
spurgar/A
putaniđar/A
skorabiar/A
dexraixar/A
ramar/A
ranpinar/A
raportar/A
raxar/A
reciđar/A
regonar/A
rengar/A
rexíster/A
riñar/A
iriŧolar/A
ròder/A
abrogar/A
roinar/A
ronkolar/A
ropegar/A
roviɉar/A
rufar/A
ruñar/A
dexruviɉar/A
sagomar/A
insakolar/A
strasalir/A
resaltar/A
samar/A
sapunir/A
satiriđar/A
scamar/A
scopađar/A
desekar/A
segar/A
konsèguer/A
seitar/A
inseɉar/A
semolar/A
akonsentir/A
konseñar/A
seraɉar/A
sesolar/A
sfarŧar/A
sialakuar/A
simular/A
skalar/A
skarselar/A
skiantar/A
deskorŧar/A
skurir/A
resolar/A
sonar/A
sotiliđar/A
spaŧiar/A
inspesir/A
inspinar/A
sporkar/A
sorastar/A
stanpar/A
stenografar/A
kostituir/A
stornir/A
strénđer/A
instruir/A
studar/A
sufraɉar/A
susitar/A
intaɉar/A
intanar/A
retardar/A
tasteđar/A
destegolar/A
intenperar/A
inténxer/A
tèñer/A
retéñer/A
sterminar/A
timonar/A
tocar/A
toniđar/A
tormentar/A
tosegar/A
trabatar/A
tranguɉar/A
trateđar/A
trepudiar/A
tripudiar/A
retrovar/A
stuŧegar/A
ŧekatređar/A
inŧeñar/A
reŧetar/A
ŧinkuantar/A
inŧivilir/A
ukelar/A
evàder/A
stravanir/A
revardar/A
travéder/A
xvelixar/A
vénŧer/A
dexvèñer/A
xverđelar/A
xvernar/A
dexvestir/A
inviar/A
xviñar/A
vixitar/A
xvolaŧar/A
dexvòlxer/A
xaolar/A
xbringar/A
suxerir/A
xlakar/A
prexudegar/A
